Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2909
Jurisdiction of the United States, defined.

Jurisdiction of the United States means any state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any American territory.

Laws 2006, LB 994, § 127;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1,371;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1002.